Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.190

Prioritizing construction of common school facilities.

The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel[,] shall prioritize the construction of common school facilities only from funds appropriated and available in the common school construction fund.

[ 2006 c 263 s 319; 1975 1st ex.s. c 98 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.47.820.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 98: See note following RCW 28A.525.166.